Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2040
Inheritance tax; estate tax; decedent dying after December 31, 1982; provisions applicable; changes applicable January 1, 2008.

Sections 77-2002 to 77-2004 and 77-2102 shall become operative on December 31, 1982, and shall apply to all property which passes from a decedent dying after such date. Sections 77-2001, 77-2032, and 77-2106 shall become operative on July 17, 1982. The changes made in sections 77-2004 to 77-2006 by Laws 2007, LB 502, apply to all property which passes from a decedent dying on or after January 1, 2008. The changes made to section 77-2010 by Laws 2007, LB 502, apply to decedents dying on or after January 1, 2008.

Laws 1982, LB 480, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB502, § 5.